Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.2231, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Firefighters and emergency medical personnel. new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), new text end whoever new text begin physically new text end assaults any of the following persons deleted text begin and inflicts demonstrable bodily harmdeleted text end is guilty of a deleted text begin felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than two years or to payment of a fine of not more than $4,000, or bothdeleted text end new text begin gross misdemeanornew text end : (1) new text begin either:new text end new text begin (i) new text end a member of a municipal or volunteer fire departmentnew text begin in the performance of the member's duties;new text end or new text begin (ii) a member of an new text end emergency medical services personnel unit in the performance of the member's duties; or (2) a physician, nurse, or other person providing health care services in a hospital emergency department. new text begin (b) Whoever physically assaults a person described in paragraph (a), clause (1) or (2), is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than three years or to payment of a fine of not more than $6,000, or both, if the assault inflicts demonstrable bodily harm. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end